Colorado, session 2026A, SB044.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-10-114, add
(2)(c) as follows:
39-10-114. Abatement - cancellation of taxes.
(2) (c) ANY TAXES LEVIED ON A SEVERED MINERAL ACCOUNT THAT
ARE DETERMINED TO BE UNCOLLECTIBLE FIVE YEARS AFTER THE DATE THE
TAXES BECOME DELINQUENT MAY BE CANCELED BY THE BOARD OF
COUNTY COMMISSIONERS OF THE COUNTY THAT LEVIED THE TAXES, AND
THE MINERAL ACCOUNT SHALL BE DISTINGUISHED AND CONVEYED TO THE
GRANTEE OR SURFACE OWNER OF RECORD BY MEANS OF RECORDED TAX
DEED, AT NO COST TO THE GRANTEE OR SURFACE OWNER OF RECORD, OR
CONVEYED TO THE TREASURER'S OFFICE.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-11-128, add (3)
as follows:
39-11-128. Condition precedent to deed - notice - exception.
(3) SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO TAXES
ON A SEVERED MINERAL ACCOUNT THAT HAVE BEEN CANCELED BY A
BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS PURSUANT TO SECTION 39-10-114
(2)(c). TAXES ON SEVERED MINERAL ACCOUNTS THAT HAVE BEEN
CANCELED BY THE BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS SHALL BE
DISTINGUISHED AND CONVEYED TO THE GRANTEE OR SURFACE OWNER OF
RECORD BY MEANS OF RECORDED TAX DEED, AND NO FEE IS REQUIRED FOR
THE PROCESSING OR RECORDING OF SUCH TAX DEED.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-11-142, amend
(6)(a) as follows:
39-11-142. Disposition of certificates held by counties.
-2- SB26-044

(6) (a) (I) Before July 1, 2024, in all cases where EXCEPT AS
PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (6)(a)(II) OF THIS SECTION, IF a tax lien on real
property has been struck off to the county at a tax sale and the county has
held the certificate of sale for thirty FIFTEEN years or more without
obtaining a tax deed as provided in this section, then such certificate may
be declared void and of no effect.
(II) IN ALL CASES WHERE A TAX LIEN ON A SEVERED MINERAL
ACCOUNT HAS BEEN STRUCK OFF TO THE COUNTY AT A TAX SALE AND THE
COUNTY HAS HELD THE CERTIFICATE OF SALE FOR FIVE YEARS OR MORE
WITHOUT OBTAINING A TAX DEED AS PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION, THEN
SUCH CERTIFICATE MAY BE DECLARED VOID AND OF NO EFFECT, AND THE
SEVERED MINERAL ACCOUNT MAY BE CONVEYED TO THE GRANTEE OR
SURFACE OWNER OF RECORD BY MEANS OF RECORDED TAX DEED.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-11-148, amend
(1) and (3) as follows:
39-11-148. Limitations on tax certificates - special
improvement liens.
(1) (a) No EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTIONS (1)(b) AND (3) OF
THIS SECTION, A lien upon real property created by a tax certificate or a
certificate of purchase issued by a treasurer on account of any delinquent
property taxes or any special assessment of any kind or nature shall NOT
remain a lien thereon for a period longer than fifteen years after the
original issuance thereof. except as provided in subsection (3) of this
section. This section shall DOES not apply to any tax certificate or
certificate of purchase issued to and held by the county, city, city and
county, or district levying such tax or special assessment; except that, in
the event of an assignment of such tax certificate or certificate of
-3- SB26-044

purchase so issued to and held by such county, city, city and county, or
district, the lien of such tax certificate or certificate of purchase shall
cease fifteen years after the date of its issuance subject only to the
provisions of subsection (3) of this section.
(b) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION, A
LIEN UPON A SEVERED MINERAL ACCOUNT CREATED BY A TAX CERTIFICATE
OR A CERTIFICATE OF PURCHASE ISSUED BY A TREASURER ON ACCOUNT OF
ANY DELINQUENT PROPERTY TAXES OR ANY SPECIAL ASSESSMENT OF ANY
KIND OR NATURE SHALL NOT REMAIN A LIEN THEREON FOR A PERIOD
LONGER THAN FIVE YEARS AFTER THE ORIGINAL ISSUANCE THEREOF. THIS
SUBSECTION (1)(b) DOES NOT APPLY TO ANY TAX CERTIFICATE OR
CERTIFICATE OF PURCHASE FOR A SEVERED MINERAL ACCOUNT THAT IS
ISSUED TO AND HELD BY THE COUNTY, CITY, CITY AND COUNTY, OR
DISTRICT LEVYING SUCH TAX OR SPECIAL ASSESSMENT; EXCEPT THAT, IN
THE EVENT OF AN ASSIGNMENT OF SUCH TAX CERTIFICATE OR CERTIFICATE
OF PURCHASE SO ISSUED TO AND HELD BY SUCH COUNTY, CITY, CITY AND
COUNTY, OR DISTRICT, THE LIEN OF SUCH TAX CERTIFICATE OR
CERTIFICATE OF PURCHASE SHALL CEASE FIVE YEARS AFTER THE DATE OF
ITS ISSUANCE SUBJECT ONLY TO THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (3) OF
THIS SECTION.
(3) (a) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (3)(b) OF THIS
SECTION, in the event of an assignment of a tax certificate or certificate
of purchase FOR REAL PROPERTY THAT IS held by a county, city, city and
county, or district levying such tax wherein such certificate is fifteen
years old at the time of assignment or will become fifteen years old within
one year from the date of such assignment, the assignee thereof shall be
IS entitled to a tax deed in the manner provided by law if such assignee or
-4- SB26-044

other legal holder of such certificate institutes proceedings to procure a
tax deed by making a demand upon the treasurer for THE same, as
provided by law, within one year from the date of such assignment by the
county, city, city and county, or district levying such tax.
(b) IN THE EVENT OF AN ASSIGNMENT OF A TAX CERTIFICATE OR
CERTIFICATE OF PURCHASE FOR A SEVERED MINERAL ACCOUNT THAT IS
HELD BY A COUNTY, CITY, CITY AND COUNTY, OR DISTRICT LEVYING SUCH
TAX WHEREIN SUCH CERTIFICATE IS FIVE YEARS OLD AT THE TIME OF
ASSIGNMENT OR WILL BECOME FIVE YEARS OLD WITHIN ONE YEAR FROM
THE DATE OF SUCH ASSIGNMENT, THE ASSIGNEE THEREOF IS ENTITLED TO
A TAX DEED IN THE MANNER PROVIDED BY LAW IF SUCH ASSIGNEE OR
OTHER LEGAL HOLDER OF SUCH CERTIFICATE INSTITUTES PROCEEDINGS TO
PROCURE A TAX DEED BY MAKING A DEMAND UPON THE TREASURER FOR
THE SAME, AS PROVIDED BY LAW, WITHIN ONE YEAR FROM THE DATE OF
SUCH ASSIGNMENT BY THE COUNTY, CITY, CITY AND COUNTY, OR DISTRICT
LEVYING SUCH TAX.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-11-151, add (4)
as follows:
39-11-151. County officials and employees may not acquire a
tax lien or property by sale of a tax lien - exception.
(4) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE CONVEYANCE OF A
SEVERED MINERAL ACCOUNT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 39-11-142
(6)(a)(II).
SECTION 6. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
-5- SB26-044

referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-6- SB26-044